language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 39 Y 22
SFX 39 0 a .
SFX 39 0 ach .
SFX 39 0 am .
SFX 39 0 ami .
SFX 39 0 e .
SFX 39 0 i .
SFX 39 0 ijo .
SFX 39 0 ijom .
SFX 39 0 ijomej .
SFX 39 0 ijomy .
SFX 39 0 ijotej .
SFX 39 0 ijośo .
SFX 39 0 ijoš .
SFX 39 0 iju .
SFX 39 0 mej .
SFX 39 0 my .
SFX 39 0 oma .
SFX 39 0 ow .
SFX 39 0 owu .
SFX 39 0 tej .
SFX 39 0 u .
SFX 39 0 śo .
SFX 40 Y 21
SFX 40 0 a .
SFX 40 0 ach .
SFX 40 0 am .
SFX 40 0 ami .
SFX 40 0 ijo .
SFX 40 0 ijom .
SFX 40 0 ijomej .
SFX 40 0 ijomy .
SFX 40 0 ijotej .
SFX 40 0 ijośo .
SFX 40 0 ijoš .
SFX 40 0 iju .
SFX 40 0 mej .
SFX 40 0 my .
SFX 40 0 oma .
SFX 40 0 ow .
SFX 40 0 owu .
SFX 40 0 tej .
SFX 40 0 u .
SFX 40 0 y .
SFX 40 0 śo .
SFX 41 Y 22
SFX 41 0 a .
SFX 41 0 ach .
SFX 41 0 am .
SFX 41 0 ami .
SFX 41 0 e .
SFX 41 0 mej .
SFX 41 0 my .
SFX 41 0 oju .
SFX 41 0 om .
SFX 41 0 oma .
SFX 41 0 ow .
SFX 41 0 owu .
SFX 41 0 tej .
SFX 41 0 u .
SFX 41 0 y .
SFX 41 0 ym .
SFX 41 0 ymej .
SFX 41 0 ymy .
SFX 41 0 ytej .
SFX 41 0 yśo .
SFX 41 0 yš .
SFX 41 0 ćo .
SFX 42 Y 23
SFX 42 0 a .
SFX 42 0 ach .
SFX 42 0 am .
SFX 42 0 ami .
SFX 42 0 e .
SFX 42 0 mej .
SFX 42 0 my .
SFX 42 0 o .
SFX 42 0 oju .
SFX 42 0 om .
SFX 42 0 oma .
SFX 42 0 ow .
SFX 42 0 owu .
SFX 42 0 tej .
SFX 42 0 u .
SFX 42 0 y .
SFX 42 0 ym .
SFX 42 0 ymej .
SFX 42 0 ymy .
SFX 42 0 ytej .
SFX 42 0 yśo .
SFX 42 0 yš .
SFX 42 0 ćo .
SFX 43 Y 13
SFX 43 0 o .
SFX 43 0 om .
SFX 43 0 omej .
SFX 43 0 omy .
SFX 43 0 otej .
SFX 43 0 ośo .
SFX 43 0 oš .
SFX 43 0 u .
SFX 43 0 y .
SFX 43 0 ymej .
SFX 43 0 ymy .
SFX 43 0 ytej .
SFX 43 0 yśo .
SFX 44 Y 29
SFX 44 0 a .
SFX 44 0 ažkuli .
SFX 44 0 e .
SFX 44 0 eg .
SFX 44 0 ego .
SFX 44 0 egožkuli .
SFX 44 0 ej .
SFX 44 0 eje .
SFX 44 0 eježkuli .
SFX 44 0 eju .
SFX 44 0 ejužkuli .
SFX 44 0 ejžkuli .
SFX 44 0 em .
SFX 44 0 emu .
SFX 44 0 emužkuli .
SFX 44 0 emžkuli .
SFX 44 0 ežkuli .
SFX 44 0 i .
SFX 44 0 ich .
SFX 44 0 ichžkuli .
SFX 44 0 im .
SFX 44 0 ima .
SFX 44 0 imažkuli .
SFX 44 0 imi .
SFX 44 0 imižkuli .
SFX 44 0 imžkuli .
SFX 44 0 ižkuli .
SFX 44 0 u .
SFX 44 0 užkuli .
SFX 45 Y 29
SFX 45 0 a .
SFX 45 0 ažkuli .
SFX 45 0 e .
SFX 45 0 eg .
SFX 45 0 ego .
SFX 45 0 egožkuli .
SFX 45 0 ej .
SFX 45 0 eje .
SFX 45 0 eježkuli .
SFX 45 0 eju .
SFX 45 0 ejužkuli .
SFX 45 0 ejžkuli .
SFX 45 0 em .
SFX 45 0 emu .
SFX 45 0 emužkuli .
SFX 45 0 emžkuli .
SFX 45 0 ežkuli .
SFX 45 0 i .
SFX 45 0 ich .
SFX 45 0 ichžkuli .
SFX 45 0 im .
SFX 45 0 ima .
SFX 45 0 imažkuli .
SFX 45 0 imi .
SFX 45 0 imižkuli .
SFX 45 0 imžkuli .
SFX 45 0 ižkuli .
SFX 45 0 u .
SFX 45 0 užkuli .
SFX 46 Y 21
SFX 46 0 a .
SFX 46 0 ach .
SFX 46 0 am .
SFX 46 0 ami .
SFX 46 0 e .
SFX 46 0 eg .
SFX 46 0 ego .
SFX 46 0 ej .
SFX 46 0 eje .
SFX 46 0 eju .
SFX 46 0 em .
SFX 46 0 emu .
SFX 46 0 i .
SFX 46 0 ich .
SFX 46 0 im .
SFX 46 0 ima .
SFX 46 0 imi .
SFX 46 0 oma .
SFX 46 0 ow .
SFX 46 0 owu .
SFX 46 0 u .
SFX 47 Y 16
SFX 47 0 a .
SFX 47 0 ach .
SFX 47 0 achmej .
SFX 47 0 achmy .
SFX 47 0 achu .
SFX 47 0 am .
SFX 47 0 ami .
SFX 47 0 ašo .
SFX 47 0 aštej .
SFX 47 0 ašćo .
SFX 47 0 e .
SFX 47 0 eju .
SFX 47 0 oma .
SFX 47 0 ow .
SFX 47 0 owu .
SFX 47 0 u .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 imi .
SFX 49 Y 2
SFX 49 0 i .
SFX 49 0 imi .
SFX 50 Y 15
SFX 50 0 ach .
SFX 50 0 achmej .
SFX 50 0 achmy .
SFX 50 0 achu .
SFX 50 0 ašo .
SFX 50 0 aštej .
SFX 50 0 ašćo .
SFX 50 0 e .
SFX 50 0 i .
SFX 50 0 im .
SFX 50 0 imej .
SFX 50 0 imy .
SFX 50 0 itej .
SFX 50 0 iśo .
SFX 50 0 iš .
SFX 51 Y 15
SFX 51 0 ach .
SFX 51 0 achmej .
SFX 51 0 achmy .
SFX 51 0 achu .
SFX 51 0 ašo .
SFX 51 0 aštej .
SFX 51 0 ašćo .
SFX 51 0 e .
SFX 51 0 i .
SFX 51 0 im .
SFX 51 0 imej .
SFX 51 0 imy .
SFX 51 0 itej .
SFX 51 0 iśo .
SFX 51 0 iš .
SFX 52 Y 4
SFX 52 0 m .
SFX 52 0 mej .
SFX 52 0 my .
SFX 52 0 š .
SFX 53 Y 22
SFX 53 0 a .
SFX 53 0 ach .
SFX 53 0 am .
SFX 53 0 ami .
SFX 53 0 e .
SFX 53 0 eg .
SFX 53 0 ego .
SFX 53 0 ej .
SFX 53 0 eju .
SFX 53 0 em .
SFX 53 0 emu .
SFX 53 0 i .
SFX 53 0 ich .
SFX 53 0 im .
SFX 53 0 ima .
SFX 53 0 imi .
SFX 53 0 oju .
SFX 53 0 om .
SFX 53 0 oma .
SFX 53 0 ow .
SFX 53 0 owu .
SFX 53 0 u .
SFX 54 Y 22
SFX 54 0 a .
SFX 54 0 ach .
SFX 54 0 am .
SFX 54 0 ami .
SFX 54 0 e .
SFX 54 0 eg .
SFX 54 0 ego .
SFX 54 0 ej .
SFX 54 0 eju .
SFX 54 0 em .
SFX 54 0 emu .
SFX 54 0 ich .
SFX 54 0 im .
SFX 54 0 ima .
SFX 54 0 imi .
SFX 54 0 o .
SFX 54 0 oju .
SFX 54 0 om .
SFX 54 0 oma .
SFX 54 0 ow .
SFX 54 0 owu .
SFX 54 0 u .
SFX 55 Y 23
SFX 55 0 a .
SFX 55 0 ach .
SFX 55 0 am .
SFX 55 0 ami .
SFX 55 0 e .
SFX 55 0 eg .
SFX 55 0 ego .
SFX 55 0 ej .
SFX 55 0 eju .
SFX 55 0 em .
SFX 55 0 emu .
SFX 55 0 i .
SFX 55 0 ich .
SFX 55 0 im .
SFX 55 0 ima .
SFX 55 0 imi .
SFX 55 0 o .
SFX 55 0 oju .
SFX 55 0 om .
SFX 55 0 oma .
SFX 55 0 ow .
SFX 55 0 owu .
SFX 55 0 u .
SFX 56 Y 23
SFX 56 0 a .
SFX 56 0 ach .
SFX 56 0 am .
SFX 56 0 ami .
SFX 56 0 e .
SFX 56 0 eg .
SFX 56 0 ego .
SFX 56 0 ej .
SFX 56 0 eju .
SFX 56 0 em .
SFX 56 0 emu .
SFX 56 0 i .
SFX 56 0 ich .
SFX 56 0 im .
SFX 56 0 ima .
SFX 56 0 imi .
SFX 56 0 o .
SFX 56 0 oju .
SFX 56 0 om .
SFX 56 0 oma .
SFX 56 0 ow .
SFX 56 0 owu .
SFX 56 0 u .
SFX 57 Y 4
SFX 57 0 a .
SFX 57 0 oju .
SFX 57 0 om .
SFX 57 0 u .
SFX 58 Y 5
SFX 58 0 a .
SFX 58 0 o .
SFX 58 0 oju .
SFX 58 0 om .
SFX 58 0 u .
SFX 59 Y 18
SFX 59 0 a .
SFX 59 0 ach .
SFX 59 0 achmej .
SFX 59 0 achmy .
SFX 59 0 achu .
SFX 59 0 am .
SFX 59 0 ami .
SFX 59 0 ašo .
SFX 59 0 aštej .
SFX 59 0 ašćo .
SFX 59 0 e .
SFX 59 0 o .
SFX 59 0 oju .
SFX 59 0 om .
SFX 59 0 oma .
SFX 59 0 ow .
SFX 59 0 owu .
SFX 59 0 u .
SFX 60 Y 21
SFX 60 0 a .
SFX 60 0 ach .
SFX 60 0 am .
SFX 60 0 ami .
SFX 60 0 e .
SFX 60 0 eju .
SFX 60 0 i .
SFX 60 0 im .
SFX 60 0 imej .
SFX 60 0 imy .
SFX 60 0 itej .
SFX 60 0 iśo .
SFX 60 0 iš .
SFX 60 0 mej .
SFX 60 0 my .
SFX 60 0 oma .
SFX 60 0 ow .
SFX 60 0 owu .
SFX 60 0 tej .
SFX 60 0 u .
SFX 60 0 ćo .
SFX 61 Y 17
SFX 61 0 a .
SFX 61 0 ach .
SFX 61 0 achmej .
SFX 61 0 achmy .
SFX 61 0 achu .
SFX 61 0 am .
SFX 61 0 ami .
SFX 61 0 ašo .
SFX 61 0 aštej .
SFX 61 0 ašćo .
SFX 61 0 e .
SFX 61 0 oju .
SFX 61 0 om .
SFX 61 0 oma .
SFX 61 0 ow .
SFX 61 0 owu .
SFX 61 0 u .
SFX 62 Y 2
SFX 62 0 tej .
SFX 62 0 ćo .
SFX 63 Y 20
SFX 63 0 a .
SFX 63 0 ach .
SFX 63 0 am .
SFX 63 0 ami .
SFX 63 0 i .
SFX 63 0 imej .
SFX 63 0 imy .
SFX 63 0 itej .
SFX 63 0 iśo .
SFX 63 0 mej .
SFX 63 0 my .
SFX 63 0 oju .
SFX 63 0 om .
SFX 63 0 oma .
SFX 63 0 ow .
SFX 63 0 owu .
SFX 63 0 tej .
SFX 63 0 u .
SFX 63 0 y .
SFX 63 0 śo .
SFX 64 Y 20
SFX 64 0 a .
SFX 64 0 e .
SFX 64 0 eg .
SFX 64 0 ego .
SFX 64 0 ej .
SFX 64 0 eje .
SFX 64 0 eju .
SFX 64 0 em .
SFX 64 0 emu .
SFX 64 0 i .
SFX 64 0 imej .
SFX 64 0 imy .
SFX 64 0 itej .
SFX 64 0 iśo .
SFX 64 0 u .
SFX 64 0 y .
SFX 64 0 ych .
SFX 64 0 ym .
SFX 64 0 yma .
SFX 64 0 ymi .
SFX 65 Y 17
SFX 65 0 a .
SFX 65 0 ach .
SFX 65 0 achmej .
SFX 65 0 achmy .
SFX 65 0 achu .
SFX 65 0 am .
SFX 65 0 ami .
SFX 65 0 ašo .
SFX 65 0 aštej .
SFX 65 0 ašćo .
SFX 65 0 e .
SFX 65 0 eju .
SFX 65 0 om .
SFX 65 0 oma .
SFX 65 0 ow .
SFX 65 0 owu .
SFX 65 0 u .
SFX 66 Y 22
SFX 66 0 a .
SFX 66 0 ach .
SFX 66 0 am .
SFX 66 0 ami .
SFX 66 0 e .
SFX 66 0 i .
SFX 66 0 im .
SFX 66 0 imej .
SFX 66 0 imy .
SFX 66 0 itej .
SFX 66 0 iśo .
SFX 66 0 iš .
SFX 66 0 mej .
SFX 66 0 my .
SFX 66 0 oju .
SFX 66 0 om .
SFX 66 0 oma .
SFX 66 0 ow .
SFX 66 0 owu .
SFX 66 0 tej .
SFX 66 0 u .
SFX 66 0 ćo .
SFX 67 Y 22
SFX 67 0 a .
SFX 67 0 ach .
SFX 67 0 am .
SFX 67 0 ami .
SFX 67 0 i .
SFX 67 0 im .
SFX 67 0 imej .
SFX 67 0 imy .
SFX 67 0 itej .
SFX 67 0 iśo .
SFX 67 0 iš .
SFX 67 0 mej .
SFX 67 0 my .
SFX 67 0 oju .
SFX 67 0 om .
SFX 67 0 oma .
SFX 67 0 ow .
SFX 67 0 owu .
SFX 67 0 tej .
SFX 67 0 u .
SFX 67 0 y .
SFX 67 0 śo .
SFX 68 Y 23
SFX 68 0 a .
SFX 68 0 ach .
SFX 68 0 am .
SFX 68 0 ami .
SFX 68 0 i .
SFX 68 0 im .
SFX 68 0 imej .
SFX 68 0 imy .
SFX 68 0 itej .
SFX 68 0 iśo .
SFX 68 0 iš .
SFX 68 0 mej .
SFX 68 0 my .
SFX 68 0 o .
SFX 68 0 oju .
SFX 68 0 om .
SFX 68 0 oma .
SFX 68 0 ow .
SFX 68 0 owu .
SFX 68 0 tej .
SFX 68 0 u .
SFX 68 0 y .
SFX 68 0 śo .
