language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Hurazk/53
Kólsk/53
Kórnack/53
Kózl/1,54
Lažk/1,55
Małk/56
Małušk/53
Mjałk/53
Sint/1,58
Sušk/56
Tock/53
Wšelak/53
alujabr/1,48
blab/68
blarj/1,59
blidarj/1,65
bryml/1,50
błomjenj/1,47
bź/1,50
casnikarj/1,65
ceptarj/1,65
cerwj/1,61
cerwjenj/1,47
chamn/1,64
chrjapl/1,50
chrop/67
chwatn/1,64
cop/67
cołnarj/1,65
danj/1,47
derbn/1,64
diakonisk/1,46
dl/51
doglědn/1,64
dojěs/1,62
dopadn/1,64
dopowě/52
dopowěs/1,62
dosegn/1,64
dozjěs/1,62
drob/67
drog/1,46
dukl/1,50
dumpn/1,64
dym/67
fararj/1,65
flinkn/1,64
gjarb/67
grafitij/1,57
gribarj/1,65
grynzl/1,50
gryzn/1,64
górk/1,46
góspodarj/1,65
góńtwarj/1,65
głodn/1,64
jachl/1,50
jagarj/1,65
jagnj/1,59
jě/52
jěs/1,62
kaln/1,64
kamjenj/1,61
kawl/1,50
kelnarj/1,65
kibl/1,50
kjacarj/1,65
kjarcmarj/1,65
kjarm/67
kjawc/42
klempnarj/1,65
kludn/1,64
kmjenj/1,61
konfetij/1,57
kop/67
krepl/1,50
kringl/1,50
kul/39
kularj/1,61
kurj/1,61
kuźerj/1,61
kwic/41
kón/1,49
kórc/41
kórjenj/1,61
kótłarj/1,65
kózl/1,50
kšocenj/1,47
kšušwick/1,46
lubk/1,46
mazl/1,50
mazn/1,64
mjenj/1,47
muml/1,50
módl/1,50
mólarj/1,65
mórj/1,59
nadpadn/1,64
najm/63
najěs/1,62
napšaw/40
nawě/52
nawěs/1,62
nałdž/1,43
njebasl/1,50
njebruml/1,50
njebydl/1,50
njecerwjenj/1,47
njecesl/1,50
njechrjachl/1,50
njechruchl/1,50
njechwatn/1,64
njedanj/1,47
njedojěs/1,62
njedopowě/52
njedopowěs/1,62
njedosegn/1,64
njedozjěs/1,62
njegnerl/1,50
njegrynšl/1,50
njejachl/1,50
njejě/52
njejěs/1,62
njekawl/1,50
njekjachl/1,50
njekringl/1,50
njekózl/1,50
njekšocenj/1,47
njemuml/1,50
njeměkl/1,50
njenadpadn/1,64
njenajěs/1,62
njenawě/52
njenawěs/1,62
njenałdž/1,43
njenužl/1,50
njepisanj/1,47
njepowě/52
njepowěs/1,62
njepreml/1,50
njepójěs/1,62
njepśedpowě/52
njepśedpowěs/1,62
njepśeglědn/1,64
njepśejěs/1,62
njepśekusn/1,64
njepśijěs/1,62
njepśipowě/52
njepśipowěs/1,62
njepśiłdž/1,43
njereml/1,50
njerozjěs/1,62
njerozpowě/52
njerozpowěs/1,62
njerozwězn/1,64
njeskiwl/1,50
njesmarcl/1,50
njespjerchl/1,50
njespowě/52
njespowěs/1,62
njestrowj/1,47
njesćerpn/1,64
njetendl/1,50
njetśawl/1,50
njetšodl/1,50
njewargl/1,50
njewiś/60
njewobełdž/1,43
njewobjěs/1,62
njewobpśimn/1,64
njewochl/1,50
njewopowě/52
njewopowěs/1,62
njewugasn/1,64
njewujěs/1,62
njewupowě/52
njewupowěs/1,62
njewurjakn/1,64
njewułdž/1,43
njewójěs/1,62
njewótdrapn/1,64
njewótełdž/1,43
njewótjěs/1,62
njewótpowě/52
njewótpowěs/1,62
njewózełdž/1,43
njewě/52
njewěs/1,62
njezagasn/1,64
njezajm/63
njezajěs/1,62
njezapowě/52
njezapowěs/1,62
njezełdž/1,43
njezgibn/1,64
njezjěs/1,62
njełdž/1,43
njeśopl/1,50
nješmyrl/1,50
nješybl/1,50
nježrědl/1,50
nježwankl/1,50
nužl/1,50
něcej/1,44
někak/45
panjekón/1,49
pastyrj/1,61
pcołkarj/1,65
pisanj/1,47
piwarj/1,65
pjeprj/1,61
plišć/66
powě/52
powěs/1,62
promjenj/1,47
puchorj/1,61
pódkup/40
pójěs/1,62
pówok/1,58
późiwn/1,64
pław/67
płomjenj/1,47
pśedpowě/52
pśedpowěs/1,62
pśejěs/1,62
pśekipn/1,64
pśerězn/1,64
pśibližn/1,64
pśijěs/1,62
pśiklapn/1,64
pśipadn/1,64
pśipowě/52
pśipowěs/1,62
pśipšaw/40
pśiłdž/1,43
pšosarj/1,65
reml/1,50
rozdźěrn/1,64
rozjěs/1,62
rozpowě/52
rozpowěs/1,62
rozpraw/40
rozpšaw/40
rozraz/41
rozwězn/1,64
rubn/1,64
rucnikarj/1,65
rybarj/1,65
samk/1,46
samodrug/1,46
san/1,49
semjenj/1,47
skaln/1,64
skjawl/1,50
spjerchl/1,50
spowě/52
spowěs/1,62
styskn/1,64
swarj/1,61
sypn/1,64
sćichn/1,64
tendl/1,50
top/67
twórj/1,61
tyšarj/1,65
tšochl/1,50
warj/1,59
wawrj/1,59
wiś/60
wjergl/1,50
wobełdž/1,43
wobjěs/1,62
wobrubn/1,64
wobwjertn/1,64
woklep/67
wopowě/52
wopowěs/1,62
wuběrn/1,64
wujěs/1,62
wupowě/52
wupowěs/1,62
wurězn/1,64
wuzbytn/1,64
wułdž/1,43
wójěs/1,62
wótbydn/1,64
wótełdž/1,43
wótjěs/1,62
wótpowě/52
wótpowěs/1,62
wótśisn/1,64
wózełdž/1,43
wě/52
wěs/1,62
zagub/40
zajm/63
zajěs/1,62
zakśiw/40
zamachn/1,64
zamkarj/1,65
zamól/39
zapowě/52
zapowěs/1,62
zarz/41
zarězn/1,64
zawjertn/1,64
zbydn/1,64
zełdž/1,43
zgub/40
zjěs/1,62
zub/67
zwign/1,64
zwónarj/1,61
Ładk/56
łom/67
śerl/1,50
śichn/1,64
śišć/66
šepjerj/1,61
šeršenj/1,61
šlap/40
šlodarj/1,65
šularj/1,65
šum/67
šuml/1,50
šwic/41
šwjerc/41
šćanj/1,47
šćerc/41
šćerj/1,61
šćěrj/1,61
źur/1,49
žeńsk/1,46
žołtn/1,64
žuml/1,50
žłob/67
